Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB896.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9711(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding an introductory paragraph and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 9711. Sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree.(a) Procedure in jury trials.--Except as provided in subsection (a.1):* * *(a.1) Undocumented migrant status.--After a verdict of murder of the first degree and the status of the defendant as an undocumented migrant are recorded, the court shall sentence the defendant to death.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (p) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Undocumented migrant." An individual who is present in the United States in violation of 8 U.S.C. Ch. 12 (relating to immigration and nationality).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0896PN0938 - 2 - 1234567